District of Columbia statutes.
22-403

Assault with intent to commit any other offense.

Whoever assaults another with intent to commit any other offense which may be punished by imprisonment in the penitentiary shall be imprisoned not more than 5 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1322, ch. 854, § 805
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(f), 60 DCR 2064
Additional penalty for possession of firearm, see § 22-4502.
Age, defenses to child sexual abuse, see § 22-3011.
Consent defense to sexual abuse, see § 22-3007.
Knowledge of age, state of mind proof requirement, see § 22-3012.
Marriage, defenses to child sexual abuse, see § 22-3011.
This section is referenced in § 5-132.21, § 22-3007, § 22-3011, § 22-3012, § 22-4001, and § 24-112.
1981 Ed., § 22-503.
1973 Ed., § 22-503.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(f) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.